Utah statutes.
63J-3-203.   Program and service adjustments to the limitation -- Funding level.

(1)  If the state transfers partial or total responsibility of a program or service to another unit of government, the appropriations limitations shall be decreased by the amount of the transfer.

(2)  If the state accepts partial or total responsibility for a program or service from another unit of government, the appropriations limit shall be increased by the amount of the transfer.

(3)  If funding exempted under this chapter for a program or service administered by the state is reduced or eliminated and the Legislature elects to fund the program or service with tax revenue, the appropriations limitations shall be increased by the amount the Legislature elects to fund.

(4)  If the state transfers the funding source of a program or service from taxes to user charges or other exempted revenue sources specified in this chapter, the maximum allowable appropriations limitations shall be decreased by the amount of the transfer.

(5)  If the Legislature transfers the funding source of a program or service from user charges or other exempted revenue sources as specified in this chapter to tax revenues, appropriations limitations shall be increased by the amount of the transfer.

(6)  If the state transfers revenues from sources exempt under this chapter to funds containing revenues from nonexempt sources, the revenues transferred shall be part of and subject to the appropriations limits of this chapter.

